Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.190

Revenues from system—Classification of services—Minimum rates—Compulsory use.

(1) The legislative body of such city or town may provide by ordinance for revenues by fixing rates and charges for the furnishing of service to those served by its system of sewerage or system for refuse collection and disposal, which rates and charges shall be uniform for the same class of customer or service. In classifying customers served or service furnished by such system of sewerage, the city or town legislative body may in its discretion consider any or all of the following factors: (a) The difference in cost of service to the various customers; (b) the location of the various customers within and without the city or town; (c) the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and replacement of the various parts of the system; (d) the different character of the service furnished various customers; (e) the quantity and quality of the sewage delivered and the time of its delivery; (f) capital contributions made to the system, including but not limited to, assessments; (g) the public benefit nonprofit corporation status, as defined in RCW 24.03A.245, of the land user; and (h) any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a ground for distinction.

(2) If special indebtedness bonds or warrants are issued against the revenues, the legislative body shall by ordinance fix charges at rates which will be sufficient to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, bond and warrant principal and interest, sinking fund requirements, and all other expenses necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system.

(3) All property owners within the area served by such sewerage system shall be compelled to connect their private drains and sewers with such city or town system, under such penalty as the legislative body of such city or town may by ordinance direct. Such penalty may in the discretion of such legislative body be an amount equal to the charge that would be made for sewer service if the property was connected to such system. All penalties collected shall be considered revenue of the system.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5212; 1995 c 124 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.190. Prior: 1959 c 90 s 2; 1941 c 193 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.